North Dakota, session 69, SB2180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 44-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Public comment - Regular meetings of a public entity.
1. Every regular meeting of a governing body of a city, county, township, school district, park
district, or water resource district must include an opportunity for an individual to provide public
comment.
2. An individual providing comment at a meeting shall provide to the governing body in writing
the individual's name and address. The individual's address is an exempt record.
3. A governing body of a city, county, township, school district, park district, or water resource
district:
a. May limit a public comment only as follows, except as provided in subdivision b :
(1) By time per speaker, total time for public comment, or both.
(2) By agenda topic, to the agendas of the current and at least one preceding meeting.
b. Shall develop a policy regarding public comment rules for regular meetings. The policy
may provide a public comment:
(1) Must be pertinent to the public entity.
(2) May not interfere with the orderly conduct of the regular meeting.
(3) May not be defamatory, abusive, harassing, or unlawful.
(4) May be prohibited if an alternative procedure exists to bring that particular type of
public comment before the public entity, the public comment includes confidential or
exempt information, or the public comment is otherwise prohibited by law.

S. B. NO. 2180 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2180.
Senate Vote: Yeas 43 Nays 4 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State